src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON BASSI !!≈ * **@CODE@** words on -bassi. Long nom-compound-forms, short gen, long heapmi-caritive
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Err/DerSub:X4X7 KEAHTTA ;
 +Err/DerSub:X4 KEAHTTA ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON MUOHTU !!≈ * **@CODE@** words on -muohtu. Short nom-compound-forms, short gen, long heapmi-caritive
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Err/DerSub:X4X7 KEAHTTA ;
 +Err/DerSub:X4 KEAHTTA ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON EADNI !!≈ * **@CODE@** eadni, gudni, ádnu. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen, short caritive
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro:%>X8 K ;  !
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;



LEXICON VALDI !!≈ * **@CODE@** words on -váldi. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen, short caritive, away with Px "váldán"
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
! +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx1V ;  away with Px "váldán"
! +Sg+Gen:%>X2 NPx1V ;  away with Px "váldán"
! +Sg+Acc:%>X2 NPx1V ;  away with Px "váldán"
 +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> NPxC ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
! +Sg+Gen:%>X8 K ;  ! ^NG^
   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON RAFI !!≈ * **@CODE@** words on -ráfi. Long nom-compound-forms, long gen. short heapmi-caritive
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
! +Sg+Gen:%>X8 K ;  ! ^NG^
!   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON LOTLOHKU !!≈ * **@CODE@** words on -lotlohku. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
  +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
   +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-

LEXICON SAPMI !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns. No nom-compounding, short gen.
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> RHyph ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%> R ;
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :%>X8 GOADE-IU- ; ! Ditto (?)
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Err/DerSub:X4X7 KEAHTTA ;
 +Err/DerSub:X4 KEAHTTA ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;
! +Use/-Spell+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giella+Der2+Der/t+A:%>X4giel AGAdj ;  !-gielat -gielagat
! +Use/-Spell+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giel:%>X4giel LEXATTR ; !-giel

LEXICON XGIELLA !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns. No nom-compounding, short gen.
! +Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giella+Der2+Der/t+A:%>X4giel AGAdj ;  !-gielat -gielagat
! +Cmp/Sh+Err/Lex:%>X4giel LEXATTR ; !-giel for MT
 :giella GOAHTI-A ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:gilli K ;


LEXICON BEALLE !!≈ * **@CODE@** words ending -bealle. Short nom-compound-forms, short gen.
 :e%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom:e K ;
 +Sg+Nom:e%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:e»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:e»X7viđi K ;
 :e%> EssV ;
 :%>áX2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:a%>j K ; !
 +Sg+Gen:e%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:e%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:e%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:e%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:e%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:e%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:e%>X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:e%>X4t K ;
 +Err/Orth:i%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :i%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :á%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :e DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
 :á DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 :á DenominalNounsV ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e R ; !Note! Same entry under GOADI-
