src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns  !!= * **@CODE@** is pointed to from NounRoot above
b-sápmi+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpNP/First+Sem/Hum:b∑-sápmi SAPMI ;
LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * **@CODE@** here goes nouns not taking Px.
ráfi+N+Sem/State:ráfi RAFI ;
LEXICON NounPxKin  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the noun lexicon for nouns which can have Px Nom 3. person, mostly kinshipterms
mannjebealle+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:mannje#beall BEALLE ;
oarpmembealle+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oarpmem9#beall BEALLE ;
áddjábealle+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:áddjá#beall BEALLE ;
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
allabassi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:alla#bassi BASSI "church holiday*** N" ;
asfáltasápmi+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/UND+Sem/Hum:asfálta#sápmi SAPMI ;
bassi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:bassi BASSI ;
boaresdárogiella+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Lang:boares#dáru# XGIELLA ;
boazodoallosápmi+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:boazo#doallo#sápmi SAPMI ;
boranávdeeisseváldi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:bora#návde#eisse#válºdi VALDI ;
davveoarjesápmi+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:davvi#oarje#sápmi SAPMI ;
doalleristeadni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:doalle#rist9#eadni EADNI ;
duhkoraddangiella+N+Sem/Lang:duhkoraddan# XGIELLA ;
duogábealle+N+Sem/Plc:duogá#beall BEALLE ;
eatnieadni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:eatni#eadni EADNI ;
eaŋkilsápmi+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Lang:eaŋkil#sápmi SAPMI ;
eiseváldi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:eise#válºdi VALDI ;
festiválaruoššagiella+N+Sem/Lang:festivála#ruošša# XGIELLA ;
girkobassi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:girko#bassi BASSI ;
giđabealle+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Time:giđa#beall BEALLE ;
greikkagiella+N+Err/Orth-nom-gen+Sem/Lang:greika# XGIELLA ;
guimmešveahkaváldi+N+Sem/Dummytag:guimmeš#veahka#válºdi VALDI ;
guollesápmi+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:guolle#sápmi SAPMI ;
guovddášoahpahuseiseváldi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:guovddáš#oahpahus#eise#válºdi VALDI ;
gákcilotlohku+N+Use/-Spell+Sem/Dummytag:gákci#lot#lohºku LOTLOHKU ;
gákcilohlohku+N+Use/-Spell+Sem/Dummytag:gákci#loh9#lohºku LOTLOHKU ;
gástaristeadni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gásta#rist9#eadni EADNI ;
gávccilotlohku+N+Sem/Amount:gávcci#lot#lohºku LOTLOHKU ;
gávccilohlohku+N+Sem/Amount:gávcci#loh9#lohºku LOTLOHKU ;
hellodatbassi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:hellodat#bassi BASSI ;
islánddagiella+N+Sem/Lang:islándda# XGIELLA ;
johtolateisseváldi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:johtolat#eisse#válºdi VALDI ;
johttisápmi+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:johtti#sápmi SAPMI ;
juovlabassi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:juovla#bassi BASSI ;
kirkobassi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:kirko#bassi BASSI ;
kymrigiella+N+Sem/Lang:kymri# XGIELLA ;
láhkaváldi+N+Sem/Dummytag:láhka#válºdi VALDI ;
maŋábealle+N+Sem/Plc:maŋá#beall BEALLE ;
meängiella+N+OLang/UND+Sem/Lang:meän# XGIELLA ;
mies'eadni+N+Sem/Dummytag:mies'#eadni EADNI ;
muitobassi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:muito#bassi BASSI ;
muohtu+N+Sem/Body:muohºtu MUOHTU ;
márkosápmi+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:márka#sápmi SAPMI ;
nirvemuohtu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Body_Hum:nirve#muohºtu MUOHTU ;
njoammeleadni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:njoammel#eadni EADNI ;
nárvemuohtu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Body_Hum:nárve#muohºtu MUOHTU ;
oalgetbealle+N+Sem/Dummytag:oalget#beall BEALLE ;
oarjesámegiella+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Lang:oarje#sámi# XGIELLA ;
oktonaseadni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oktonas#eadni EADNI ;
ovccilotlohku+N+Sem/Amount:ovcci#lot#lohºku LOTLOHKU ;
ovccilohlohku+N+Sem/Amount:ovcci#loh9#lohºku LOTLOHKU ;
ođđabeaibassi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:ođđa#beai#bassi BASSI ;
ođđajagebassi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time:ođđa#jage#bassi BASSI ;
pláneneiseváldi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:plánen#eise#válºdi VALDI ;
prosápmi+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:pro#sápmi SAPMI ;
riikkaeadni+N+Err/Orth-nom-gen+Sem/Hum:riika#eadni EADNI ;
rumšomuohtu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Body_Hum:rumšo#muohºtu MUOHTU ;
ruoššagiella+N+Sem/Lang:ruošša# XGIELLA ;
ráfi+N+Err/Orth+Sem/State:rafi RAFI ;
sihkarvuođaváldi+N+Sem/Dummytag:sihkarvuođa#válºdi VALDI ;
skárrebealle+N+Sem/Dummytag:skárre#beall BEALLE ;
superváldi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:super#válºdi VALDI ;
sámegiella+N+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Lang:same# XGIELLA ;
sávzaeadni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:sávza#eadni EADNI ;
ubmisápmi+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ubmi#sápmi SAPMI ;
álbmotregisttareisseváldi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:álbmot#registtar#eisse#válºdi VALDI ;
áldueadni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:áldu#eadni EADNI ;
čiežalotlohku+N+Sem/Amount:čieža#lot#lohºku LOTLOHKU ;
čiežalohlohku+N+Sem/Amount:čieža#loh9#lohºku LOTLOHKU ;
čoahkkelohku+N+Sem/Amount:čoahkke#lohºku LOTLOHKU ;
čuoikaeadni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:čuoika#eadni EADNI ;
šipmárbealle+N+Sem/Dummytag:šipmár#beall BEALLE ;
